Tennessee, session 114, SB1359.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-7-112(e), is amended by deleting
the first sentence of the subsection and substituting instead the following:
The commission shall, by July 1, 2025, and by each July 1 thereafter, provide a
copy of the report to the governor, the education and commerce and labor
committees of the senate, and the committees of the house of representatives
having jurisdiction over higher education and commerce, respectively.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB1359
003347
- 1 -